Arkansas statutes. Title 2 Agriculture
Chapter 23

Arbitration of Defective Seed Claims

2-23-101. Definitions.

As used in this subchapter:

“Advertisement” means all representations other than those on the label written, recorded, or published and distributed by the labeler;

“Agricultural seed” means the seeds of grass, forage, cereal, oil and fiber crops, and any other kinds of seed commonly recognized within this state as agricultural seeds and mixtures of such seed;

“Arbitration committee” means the committee established by the Director of the State Plant Board under this subchapter to hear and make determinations in mandatory, nonbinding arbitration cases;

“Buyer” means a person who purchases agricultural seeds;

“Chairperson” means the person selected by the arbitration committee from among its members to preside over arbitration hearings;

“Dealer” means any person, individual, partnership, or company who distributes agricultural seeds;

“Label” means the display or displays of written, printed, or graphic matter upon or attached to the container of seed or as required by rules established under the Arkansas Plant Act of 1917, § 2-16-201 et seq.;

“Labeler” means the person, firm, corporation, or the registered code number whose name appears on the label or container of seed;

“Labeling” includes all labels, advertisements, and other written, printed, or graphic representations in any manner whatsoever pertaining to any seed, whether in bulk or in containers, and includes representations on invoices except for current, official publications of the United States Department of Agriculture and the United States Department of the Interior, state experiment stations, state agricultural colleges, and other similar federal or state institutions or agencies authorized by law to conduct research; and

“Person” means an individual, firm, partnership, corporation, or company.

Amendments. The 2007 amendment deleted former subdivisions (7) and (12).

History.

Acts 1991, No. 1024, § 1; 1999, No. 921, § 1; 2007, No. 827, §§ 3, 4.

2-23-102. Prerequisite to legal action — Notice — Arbitration committee.

When any buyer believes that he or she has been damaged by the failure of agricultural seed to produce or perform as represented by the labeling of the agricultural seed, as a prerequisite to the buyer's right to maintain a legal action against the dealer or labeler and within a reasonable time after the alleged defect or violation becomes apparent, the buyer shall file a written notice of intent to seek arbitration to permit inspection of the crops or plants during the growing season.

A meeting shall be scheduled by the Director of the State Plant Board between the buyer and labeler for the purpose of resolving the dispute, or if the dispute is not resolved, for officially filing the complaint.

The buyer shall make a sworn complaint against the dealer or labeler alleging the damages sustained or to be sustained and file the complaint with the director.

The buyer shall send a copy of the complaint to the labeler by United States registered mail.

A filing fee of two hundred fifty dollars ($250) plus one dollar ($1.00) per acre filed on, not to exceed a total of seven hundred fifty dollars ($750), shall be paid to the director with each complaint filed, and complaints shall be filed on forms provided by the State Plant Board.

This fee shall be deposited into the Plant Board Fund in the State Treasury and may be used by the director to offset expenses of the investigation.

Within ten (10) days after receipt of a copy of the complaint, the labeler shall file with the director the labeler's answer to the complaint and send a copy of the answer to the buyer by United States registered mail.

However, unless notice of this section is legibly printed or typed on the seed container or on a label affixed to the seed container or printed on the invoice covering bulk seed, the buyer shall not be required to comply with this section as a prerequisite to maintaining a legal action against the dealer or labeler.

A notice in the following form, or some reasonably equivalent language, is sufficient:

“Notice of Mandatory Arbitration

NOTICE: As a prerequisite to maintaining a legal action based upon the failure of seed to which this label is attached to produce as represented, a consumer shall file a sworn complaint with the Director of the State Plant Board within such time as to permit inspection of the crops or plants during the growing season.”

If language setting forth the requirement is not so placed on the seed package, analysis label, or invoice covering bulk seed shipments, the filing and serving of a complaint under this section are not required.

Complaint to the plant board filed within ten days after defectiveness of seeds became apparent was a condition precedent to a legal action against the seed manufacturer and farmer's failure to comply with the mandatory notice requirements precluded his or her legal action for damages. Slusser v. Farm Serv., 359 Ark. 392, 198 S.W.3d 106 (2004).

Terms for seed grower, seed dealer, farm bureau, and agricultural council members shall be for four (4) years.

The members and alternates shall be confirmed by the Governor.

(A)The Director of the University of Arkansas Agricultural Experiment Station, or his or her designee or alternate, and the Director of the University of Arkansas Cooperative Extension Service, or his or her designee or alternate, shall serve as ex officio members.

Ex officio members shall serve until replaced by their organizations.

Recommending organizations shall submit member recommendations not less than thirty (30) days before the expiration day of an expiring term.

Each alternate member shall serve only in the absence of the member for whom he or she is an alternate.

Members of the committee may receive expense reimbursement in accordance with § 25-16-901 et seq.

Publisher's Notes. Acts 1991, No. 1024, § 2, provided, in part, that the original committee shall be appointed so that the Seed Growers Association member shall serve one (1) year, the Seed Dealers Association member shall serve two (2) years and the Farm Bureau member shall serve three (3) years.

Meaning of “this act”. The phrase “this act” in subsection (a) of this section refers to Acts 1999, No. 921, which amended various provisions of this section and §§2-23-101 —2-23-104,2-23-107, and2-23-108.

In any contract governing the sale of the seed; or

Before the official filing of arbitration.

In the absence of an agreement to be bound by arbitration, a buyer may commence legal proceedings against a seller or assert such claim, as a counterclaim or defense in any action brought by the seller, at any time after the receipt of the report of arbitration.

(A)In litigation involving a complaint which has been the subject of arbitration under this section, any party may introduce the report of arbitration as evidence of the facts found in the report, and the court may give such weight to the committee's findings and conclusions of law and recommendations as to damages and costs as the court may see fit based upon all the evidence before the court.

The court may also take into account any findings of the committee with respect to the failure of any party to cooperate in the arbitration proceedings, including any finding as to the effect of delay in filing the arbitration claim upon the committee's ability to determine the facts of the case.

Complaint to the plant board filed within ten days after defectiveness of seeds became apparent was a condition precedent to legal action against the seed manufacturer and farmer's failure to comply with the mandatory notice requirements precluded his or her legal action for damages; farmer knew as early as July 1998 that the seeds were not germinating properly but did not file a complaint with the board until more than five months later. Slusser v. Farm Serv., 359 Ark. 392, 198 S.W.3d 106 (2004).

In conducting its investigation, the arbitration committee may:

An investigation made by less than the whole membership of the committee shall be by authority of a written directive by the chairperson, and the investigation shall be summarized in writing and considered by the committee in reporting its findings and making its recommendations.

History.

Acts 1991, No. 1024, § 2; 1999, No. 921, § 2.

2-23-103. Seed dealer or labeler may request investigation — Requirements.

(1)Any seed dealer or labeler against whom suit is brought in any state or federal court by a buyer who alleges that he or she has been damaged by the failure of seeds purchased from a seed dealer to perform as labeled, may request an investigation by the arbitration committee.

A filing fee of two hundred fifty dollars ($250) plus one dollar ($1.00) per acre filed on, not to exceed a total of seven hundred fifty dollars ($750), shall be paid by the party.

The Director of the State Plant Board shall refer the complaint and the answer to the complaint to the arbitration committee provided in §2-23-104 for investigation, findings, and recommendations on the matters complained of.

History.

Acts 1991, No. 1024, § 2; 1999, No. 921, § 3.

2-23-104. Arbitration committee — Members.

(1)(A)The Director of the State Plant Board shall appoint an arbitration committee composed of six (6) members and six (6) alternate members with one (1) member and one (1) alternate to be appointed upon the recommendation of each of the following:

The President of the Arkansas Seed Growers Association;

The President of the Arkansas Seed Dealers Association;

The President of the Arkansas Farm Bureau Federation; and

The President of the Agricultural Council of Arkansas.

(1)The committee shall elect a chairperson from its membership and the Director of the State Plant Board, or his or her designee, shall serve as secretary of the committee and shall not vote.

It is the duty of the chairperson to conduct all meetings and deliberations held by the committee and to direct all other activities of the committee.

It is the duty of the secretary to keep accurate and correct records on all meetings and deliberations and perform other duties for the committee as directed by the chairperson.

History.

Acts 1991, No. 1024, § 2; 1997, No. 250, § 5; 1999, No. 921, § 4.

2-23-105. Committee purpose.

The purpose of the arbitration committee is to assist agricultural seed buyers and agricultural seed dealers or labelers in determining the facts relating to matters alleged in complaints made by buyers against dealers or labelers. The committee may make rules to carry out the purposes of this act.

The committee may recommend money damages be paid the buyer as a result of alleged failure of seeds to produce as represented by the labeling of the seed and may also recommend that the seed dealer or labeler reimburse the buyer for the amount of the filing fee paid by the buyer.

History.

Acts 1991, No. 1024, § 2; 1999, No. 921, § 5.

2-23-106. Committee — Meetings — Informal hearing.

The arbitration committee may be called into session by the Director of the State Plant Board or upon the direction of the chairperson to consider the matters referred to it by the board.

If the committee determines that an informal hearing should be conducted to allow each party an opportunity to present his or her respective side of the dispute, attorneys may be present at the hearing to confer with their clients, but may not participate directly in the proceedings unless requested to do so by the chairperson of the arbitration committee.

History.

Acts 1991, No. 1024, § 2.

2-23-107. Committee — Investigation and report — Findings as evidence.

When the Director of the State Plant Board refers to the arbitration committee any complaint made by a buyer against a dealer or labeler, the committee shall make a full and complete investigation of the matters complained of and at the conclusion of the investigation, report through its secretary the findings and recommendations to the buyer and to the labeler by United States registered mail.

(1)The report of arbitration shall be binding upon all parties to the extent, if any, that they have so agreed:

History.

Acts 1991, No. 1024, § 2; 1999, No. 921, § 6.

2-23-108. Committee — Investigative powers.

Examine the buyer on his or her use of the seed of which he or she complains and the dealer or labeler on his or her packaging, labeling, and selling operation of the seed alleged to be faulty;

Grow to production a representative sample of the alleged faulty seed through the facilities of the state, under the supervision of the Director of the State Plant Board, when such action is deemed by the committee to be necessary;

Hold informal hearings at a time and place directed by the chairperson of the committee upon reasonable notice to the buyer and the dealer or labeler; and

Seek evaluations from authorities in allied disciplines, when deemed necessary.

History.

Acts 1991, No. 1024, § 2; 1999, No. 921, § 7.

2-23-109. Committee records.

The committee shall keep a record of its activities and reports on file in the State Plant Board.

History.

Acts 1991, No. 1024, § 2.

2-23-110. Notice.

The consumer and seedsman shall give written notice to the department of the acceptance or rejection of the arbitration committee's recommended terms of settlement within thirty (30) days from the date such recommended terms of settlement are issued by the arbitration committee.

History.

Acts 1991, No. 1024, § 2.